Utah statutes.
63A-5-301.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1) (a)  "Agency" means each department, commission, board, council, agency,
institution, officer, corporation, fund, division, office, committee,
authority, laboratory, library, unit, bureau, panel, or other administrative
unit of the state.
(b)  "Agency" does not include:
(i)  the legislative branch;
(ii)  the judicial branch; and
(iii)  a higher education institution.
(2)  "Agency optional term" means an option that is exclusively exercisable by
an agency to extend the lease term.
(3)  "Director" means director of the Division of Facilities Construction and
Management.
(4)  "Division" means the Division of Facilities Construction and Management.
(5)  "High-cost lease" means a real property lease that:
(a)  has an initial term including any agency optional term of ten years or
more; or
(b)  will require lease payments of more than $5,000,000 over the term of the
lease including any agency optional term.
(6)  "Significant lease terms" includes the duration of the lease, the
frequency of the periodic payments, renewal clauses, purchase options,
cancellation clauses, repair and maintenance clauses, and restrictions on use
of the property.
